Maine, session 132, LD1204.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §9054, sub-§11, ¶F, as enacted by PL 2015, c. 299, §25, is
amended to read:
F. Convictions for a Class A, B or C crime in this State or similar crime in another
jurisdiction for an offense relating to the unlawful manufacture, distribution,
prescription or dispensing of a controlled substance, except for a conviction for
aggravated cultivating of marijuana under Title 17-A, section 1105-D; and